Oklahoma, session 2026, SB698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-113.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 18-113.1. A. The provisions of this subsection shall


apply only to grades one through three.


1. Except as otherwise provided for in this section, no child


shall be included in the average daily membership of a school


district for the purpose of computing and paying state-appropriated


funds if that child is regularly assigned to a teacher or to a class


that includes more than twenty (20) students.



Req. No. 1364 Page 1


2. If a class or classes in a grade exceed the class size


limitation provided for in this subsection, the class size


limitation and penalty shall not apply if:


a. the creation of an additional class would cause a


class to have fewer than ten (10) students;, and


b. a teacher’s assistant, as defined in Section 6-127 of


this title, is employed to serve with each teacher in


a class that exceeds the class size limitation


provided for in this subsection.


3. No school district shall be penalized for exceeding class


size limitations set forth in this subsection if the limitations are


exceeded beginning after the first nine (9) weeks October 1 of the


each school year.


Any school district found to be in violation of the provisions


of this subsection shall receive a penalty in the State Aid formula


as a reduction to State Aid to be determined as follows:


a. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Base Foundation


Support Level for the current school year, and


b. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Salary Incentive



Req. No. 1364 Page 2


Aid guarantee for the current school year times twenty


(20), and


c. Sum sum the products of subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph.


B. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to grades


four through six.


1. Except as otherwise provided for in this section, no child


shall be included in the average daily membership of a school


district for the purpose of computing and paying state-appropriated


funds if that child is regularly assigned to a teacher or to a class


that includes more than twenty (20) students.


2. If a class or classes in a grade exceed the class size


limitation provided for in this subsection, the class size


limitation and penalty shall not apply if the creation of an


additional class would cause a class to have fewer than sixteen (16)


students.


3. No school district shall be penalized for exceeding class


size limitations set forth in this subsection if the limitations are


exceeded beginning after the first nine (9) weeks October 1 of the


each school year.


4. Any school district found to be in violation of the


provisions of this subsection shall receive a penalty in the State


Aid formula as a reduction to State Aid to be determined as follows:



Req. No. 1364 Page 3


a. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Base Foundation


Support Level for the current school year, and


b. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Salary Incentive


Aid guarantee for the current school year times twenty


(20), and


c. Sum sum the products of subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph.


C. Classes in under the following subjects subject code


umbrellas shall not be subject to the class size limitations


provided for in subsections A and B of this section:


1. Physical education; and


2. Chorus, band, orchestra and similar music classes Fine arts;


3. Careers/exploration; and


4. Library science.


D. If a school district groups its grades as grades one through


five, grades six through eight, and grades nine through twelve, then


as to such district the provisions of subsection B of this section


shall apply to grades four and five rather than grades four through


six, and the provisions of Section 18-113.3 of this title shall


apply to grades six through twelve.

Req. No. 1364 Page 4


E. Any violations of the provisions of this section shall


result in denial of accreditation in accordance with the


requirements of Section 3-104.4 of this title.


F. Any school district which at the beginning of the school


year does not have sufficient classrooms to meet the class size


limitation provided for in this section as determined by guidelines


established by the State Board of Education shall not be penalized


for failure to meet the class size limitations provided for in this


section if:


a. the


1. The school district has voted indebtedness, at any time


within the five (5) years preceding the year the district exceeds


the class size limitations or during the year the district exceeds


the class size limitations, through the issuance of bonds or


approval by voters of issuance of new bonds for more than eighty-


five percent (85%) of the maximum allowable pursuant to the


provisions of Section 26 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


as shown on the school district budget filed with the State


Equalization Board of Equalization for the current school year and


certifications by the Attorney General prior to February 1 of the


current school year; and


b. on


2. On the date of filing of the school district budget with the


State Equalization Board of Equalization, the school district is

Req. No. 1364 Page 5


voting the maximum millage allowable for the support, maintenance,


and construction of schools as provided for in subsections (a), (c),


(d), and (d-1) of Section 9 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution and Section 10 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution.


G. Any school district which exceeds the class size limitations


as set forth in this section shall submit a written report to the


State Board of Education, on or before July 1 of each year, setting


forth the procedures that the district will follow in order to


comply with this section.


H. School districts which receive state-appropriated funds


pursuant to the provisions of Section 18-112.2 of this title and do


not comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to


loss of State Aid for each child in excess of the class size


limitations specified in this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-113.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 18-113.2. A. The provisions of this section shall


apply only to kindergarten.


1. No child shall be included in the average daily membership


of a school district for the purpose of computing and paying state-


appropriated funds if that child is regularly assigned to a teacher


or to a class that includes more than twenty (20) students.



Req. No. 1364 Page 6


2. If a class or classes in a grade exceed the class size


limitation provided for in this subsection, the class size


limitation and penalty shall not apply if:


a. the creation of an additional class would cause a


class to have fewer than ten (10) students;, and


b. a teacher’s assistant, as defined in Section 6-127 of


this title, is employed to serve with each teacher in


a class that exceeds the class size limitation


provided for in this subsection.


3. No school district shall be penalized for exceeding class


size limitations set forth in this section if the limitations are


exceeded beginning after the first nine (9) weeks October 1 of the


each school year.


4. Any school district which at the beginning of the school


year does not have sufficient classrooms to meet the class size


limitation provided for in this section as determined by guidelines


established by the State Board of Education shall not be penalized


for failure to meet the class size limitations provided for in this


section if:


a. the school district has voted indebtedness, at any


time within the five (5) years preceding the year the


district exceeds the class size limitations or during


the year the district exceeds the class size


limitations, through the issuance of bonds or approval

Req. No. 1364 Page 7


by voters of issuance of new bonds for more than


eighty-five percent (85%) of the maximum allowable


pursuant to the provisions of Section 26 of Article X


of the Oklahoma Constitution as shown on the school


district budget filed with the State Equalization


Board of Equalization for the current school year and


certifications by the Attorney General prior to


February 1 of the current school year;, and


b. on the date of filing of the school district budget


with the State Equalization Board of Equalization, the


school district is voting the maximum millage


allowable for the support, maintenance, and


construction of schools as provided for in subsections


(a), (c), (d), and (d-1) of Section 9 of Article X of


the Oklahoma Constitution and Section 10 of Article X


of the Oklahoma Constitution.


5. Any school district found to be in violation of the


provisions of this subsection shall receive a penalty in the State


Aid formula as a reduction to State Aid to be determined as follows:


a. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Base Foundation


Support Level for the current school year, and



Req. No. 1364 Page 8


b. Multiply multiply each pupil in excess of the class


size membership limit as provided in this subsection


by the grade level weight and by the Salary Incentive


Aid guarantee for the current school year times twenty


(20), and


c. Sum sum the products of subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph.


B. Any violations of the provisions of this section shall


result in denial of accreditation in accordance with the


requirements of Section 3-104.4 of this title.


C. School districts which receive state-appropriated funds


pursuant to the provisions of Section 18-112.2 of this title and do


not comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to


loss of State Aid for each child in excess of the class size


limitations specified in this section.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-113.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 18-113.3. A. Class size, as used in Section 18-113.1


and Section 18-113.2 of this title, shall be determined by the


average daily membership divided by the full-time equivalency of the


instructional staff assigned to each grade level by site. Full-time


equivalency of special education teachers, Chapter 1 teachers, and


teachers of classes not subject to class size limitations and the



Req. No. 1364 Page 9


average daily membership of self-contained special education classes


shall not be counted in class size computation.


B. As used in this section, self-contained special education


classes are those classes whose students attend the same class for


three (3) or more class periods and who have individualized


education plans.


C. Beginning with the 1996-97 school year and each school year


thereafter, no teacher who is counted in class size count for grades


seven through twelve shall be responsible for the instruction of


more than one hundred forty (140) students on any given six-hour


school day. Class size count shall be taken during the month of


October of each school year on a date set by the State Board of


Education on October 1. If the class size count is in excess of the


limits set forth in this subsection, the school district shall be


subject to the penalties provided for in this section.


D. Students within a class which is not subject to class size


limitations pursuant to subsection D of Section 18-113.1 of this


title shall not be counted for purposes of the limitations set forth


in subsection C of this section.


E. No school district shall be penalized for exceeding class


size limitations set forth in this section if the limitations are


exceeded beginning after the first nine (9) weeks October 1 of the


each school year.



Req. No. 1364 Page 10


F. The first year that a school district exceeds the class size


membership limitation as established and computed in subsection C of


this section, the district shall receive as a penalty a reduction in


the State Aid for the district. For each child in excess of the


class size limitation, the reduction in State Aid to the district


shall be determined as follows:


1. Multiply the averaged number of the October 1 class size


count of pupils which is in excess of the class size membership


limit as provided for in subsection C of this section by the grade


weight and by the Base Foundation Support Level for the current


school year;


2. Multiply the averaged number of the October 1 class size


count of pupils which is in excess of the class size membership


limit as provided for in subsection C of this section by the grade


level weight and by the Salary Incentive Aid guarantee for the


current school year times twenty (20); and


3. Sum the products of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection.


G. If a school district exceeds the class size membership


limitation as established and computed in subsection C of this


section for two (2) consecutive years, the district shall receive as


a penalty denial of accreditation in accordance with the


requirements of Section 3-104.4 of this title.





Req. No. 1364 Page 11


H. For the purpose of determining whether a penalty for


exceeding class size limitations shall apply, a federally funded


bilingual assistant shall not qualify as a teacher’s assistant.


I. Any school district which at the beginning of the school


year does not have sufficient classrooms to meet the class size


limitation provided for in this section as determined by guidelines


established by the State Board of Education shall not be penalized


for failure to meet the class size limitations provided for in this


section if:


1. The school district has voted indebtedness, at any time


within the five (5) years preceding the year the district exceeds


the class size limitations or during the year the district exceeds


the class size limitations, through the issuance of bonds or


approval by voters of issuance of new bonds for more than eighty-


five percent (85%) of the maximum allowable pursuant to the


provisions of Section 26 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


as shown on the school district budget filed with the State


Equalization Board of Equalization for the current school year and


certifications by the Attorney General prior to February 1 of the


current school year; and


2. On the date of filing of the school district budget with the


State Equalization Board of Equalization, the school district is


voting the maximum millage allowable for the support, maintenance,


and construction of schools as provided for in subsections (a), (c),

Req. No. 1364 Page 12


(d), and (d-1) of Section 9 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution and Section 10 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution.


J. Any school district which exceeds the class size limitations


as set forth in this section shall submit a written report to the


State Board of Education, on or before July 1 of each year, setting


forth the procedures that the district will follow in order to


comply with this section.


K. School districts which receive state-appropriated funds


pursuant to the provisions of Section 18-112.2 of this title and do


not comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to


loss of State Aid for each child in excess of the class size


limitations as specified in this section.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-113.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 18-113.4. A. Beginning with the 1997-98 school year,


the penalties for exceeding class size limitations established in


Sections 18-113.1, 18-113.2, and 18-113.3 of this title shall not


apply if the class size limitations, as set forth in said such


sections, are exceeded beginning after the first nine (9) weeks


October 1 of the each school year. If the class size limitations


are exceeded during the first nine (9) weeks prior to October 1 of


any school year, the penalties shall apply.



Req. No. 1364 Page 13


B. For the purposes of calculating class size penalties


established in Sections 18-113.1, 18-113.2, and 18-113.3 of this


title, school districts shall use only the full-time-equivalency of


the instructional staff who are under contract to work the full


school year in question.


C. Beginning July 1, 2003, school districts that participate in


consolidation or annexation pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma School Voluntary Consolidation and Annexation Act shall be


exempt from the provisions of Sections 18-113.1, 18-113.2, and 18-


113.3 of this title for the year in which the consolidation or


annexation occurs and for the next five (5) fiscal years.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1364 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:34 AM













Req. No. 1364 Page 14